Utah statutes.
26-38-3.5.   Smoking ban exemption for Native American ceremony.
(1)  A person is exempt from the restrictions of Section 26-38-3 if the
person:
(a)  is a member of an American Indian tribe whose members are recognized as
eligible for the special programs and services provided by the United States
to American Indians who are members of those tribes;
(b)  is an American Indian who actively practices an American Indian religion,
the origin and interpretation of which is from a traditional American Indian
culture;
(c)  is smoking tobacco using the traditional pipe of an American Indian
tribal religious ceremony, of which tribe the person is a member, and is
smoking the pipe as part of that ceremony; and
(d)  the ceremony is conducted by a pipe carrier, Indian spiritual person, or
medicine person recognized by the tribe of which the person is a member and
the Indian community.
(2)  This section takes precedence over Section 26-38-3.
(3)  A religious ceremony using a traditional pipe under this section is
subject to any applicable state or local law, except as provided in this
section.
